dev/cjk.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<barb%>

LEXICON Root 

Chars ;

LEXICON CharsLoop

# ;
Chars ;

LEXICON Chars
万 CharsLoop ;
不 CharsLoop ;
专 CharsLoop ;
丙 CharsLoop ;
丝 CharsLoop ;
丧 CharsLoop ;
串 CharsLoop ;
为 CharsLoop ;
乃 CharsLoop ;
之 CharsLoop ;
乐 CharsLoop ;
九 CharsLoop ;
乡 CharsLoop ;
乳 CharsLoop ;
争 CharsLoop ;
亏 CharsLoop ;
井 CharsLoop ;
亡 CharsLoop ;
亦 CharsLoop ;
京 CharsLoop ;
人 CharsLoop ;
仁 CharsLoop ;
今 CharsLoop ;
仑 CharsLoop ;
他 CharsLoop ;
代 CharsLoop ;
仪 CharsLoop ;
件 CharsLoop ;
仿 CharsLoop ;
伏 CharsLoop ;
优 CharsLoop ;
伟 CharsLoop ;
伪 CharsLoop ;
伸 CharsLoop ;
但 CharsLoop ;
住 CharsLoop ;
余 CharsLoop ;
你 CharsLoop ;
佼 CharsLoop ;
例 CharsLoop ;
侠 CharsLoop ;
侯 CharsLoop ;
促 CharsLoop ;
俗 CharsLoop ;
俭 CharsLoop ;
倍 CharsLoop ;
倡 CharsLoop ;
债 CharsLoop ;
偏 CharsLoop ;
偶 CharsLoop ;
傀 CharsLoop ;
催 CharsLoop ;
僕 CharsLoop ;
儡 CharsLoop ;
元 CharsLoop ;
先 CharsLoop ;
兑 CharsLoop ;
入 CharsLoop ;
六 CharsLoop ;
兴 CharsLoop ;
典 CharsLoop ;
兽 CharsLoop ;
冈 CharsLoop ;
写 CharsLoop ;
冢 CharsLoop ;
冯 CharsLoop ;
况 CharsLoop ;
准 CharsLoop ;
减 CharsLoop ;
凡 CharsLoop ;
凰 CharsLoop ;
出 CharsLoop ;
刀 CharsLoop ;
刍 CharsLoop ;
列 CharsLoop ;
创 CharsLoop ;
利 CharsLoop ;
刷 CharsLoop ;
刻 CharsLoop ;
前 CharsLoop ;
剥 CharsLoop ;
副 CharsLoop ;
劝 CharsLoop ;
务 CharsLoop ;
努 CharsLoop ;
劳 CharsLoop ;
勉 CharsLoop ;
勘 CharsLoop ;
勿 CharsLoop ;
匈 CharsLoop ;
匹 CharsLoop ;
十 CharsLoop ;
午 CharsLoop ;
卑 CharsLoop ;
南 CharsLoop ;
卡 CharsLoop ;
卫 CharsLoop ;
却 CharsLoop ;
卿 CharsLoop ;
历 CharsLoop ;
厕 CharsLoop ;
厢 CharsLoop ;
去 CharsLoop ;
叉 CharsLoop ;
反 CharsLoop ;
受 CharsLoop ;
叠 CharsLoop ;
另 CharsLoop ;
召 CharsLoop ;
右 CharsLoop ;
叹 CharsLoop ;
合 CharsLoop ;
名 CharsLoop ;
吓 CharsLoop ;
吟 CharsLoop ;
含 CharsLoop ;
吴 CharsLoop ;
吾 CharsLoop ;
呢 CharsLoop ;
呼 CharsLoop ;
咏 CharsLoop ;
咬 CharsLoop ;
咸 CharsLoop ;
哇 CharsLoop ;
哎 CharsLoop ;
哟 CharsLoop ;
哪 CharsLoop ;
哺 CharsLoop ;
唑 CharsLoop ;
唯 CharsLoop ;
問 CharsLoop ;
啦 CharsLoop ;
喂 CharsLoop ;
喊 CharsLoop ;
喧 CharsLoop ;
嗣 CharsLoop ;
嘉 CharsLoop ;
嘿 CharsLoop ;
噶 CharsLoop ;
囚 CharsLoop ;
囡 CharsLoop ;
困 CharsLoop ;
图 CharsLoop ;
圊 CharsLoop ;
在 CharsLoop ;
场 CharsLoop ;
坊 CharsLoop ;
坐 CharsLoop ;
坛 CharsLoop ;
坡 CharsLoop ;
垃 CharsLoop ;
垠 CharsLoop ;
埃 CharsLoop ;
埠 CharsLoop ;
堆 CharsLoop ;
堪 CharsLoop ;
塒 CharsLoop ;
填 CharsLoop ;
增 CharsLoop ;
士 CharsLoop ;
壶 CharsLoop ;
复 CharsLoop ;
多 CharsLoop ;
天 CharsLoop ;
央 CharsLoop ;
夸 CharsLoop ;
奈 CharsLoop ;
奏 CharsLoop ;
奖 CharsLoop ;
奢 CharsLoop ;
奶 CharsLoop ;
如 CharsLoop ;
妈 CharsLoop ;
妙 CharsLoop ;
妹 CharsLoop ;
姊 CharsLoop ;
姓 CharsLoop ;
姬 CharsLoop ;
娅 CharsLoop ;
娱 CharsLoop ;
婚 CharsLoop ;
媒 CharsLoop ;
嫂 CharsLoop ;
嬉 CharsLoop ;
字 CharsLoop ;
孜 CharsLoop ;
季 CharsLoop ;
孳 CharsLoop ;
宅 CharsLoop ;
宋 CharsLoop ;
官 CharsLoop ;
宜 CharsLoop ;
审 CharsLoop ;
宪 CharsLoop ;
害 CharsLoop ;
容 CharsLoop ;
寂 CharsLoop ;
富 CharsLoop ;
寡 CharsLoop ;
寰 CharsLoop ;
寻 CharsLoop ;
射 CharsLoop ;
小 CharsLoop ;
尖 CharsLoop ;
尝 CharsLoop ;
尸 CharsLoop ;
尽 CharsLoop ;
屁 CharsLoop ;
届 CharsLoop ;
屑 CharsLoop ;
屡 CharsLoop ;
岁 CharsLoop ;
岚 CharsLoop ;
岭 CharsLoop ;
峭 CharsLoop ;
崇 CharsLoop ;
崩 CharsLoop ;
巢 CharsLoop ;
巨 CharsLoop ;
已 CharsLoop ;
币 CharsLoop ;
帆 CharsLoop ;
帕 CharsLoop ;
带 CharsLoop ;
常 CharsLoop ;
幕 CharsLoop ;
并 CharsLoop ;
幽 CharsLoop ;
庆 CharsLoop ;
库 CharsLoop ;
庙 CharsLoop ;
度 CharsLoop ;
庸 CharsLoop ;
廷 CharsLoop ;
弃 CharsLoop ;
式 CharsLoop ;
弘 CharsLoop ;
弥 CharsLoop ;
弱 CharsLoop ;
当 CharsLoop ;
彦 CharsLoop ;
彭 CharsLoop ;
彻 CharsLoop ;
径 CharsLoop ;
律 CharsLoop ;
得 CharsLoop ;
微 CharsLoop ;
必 CharsLoop ;
忏 CharsLoop ;
忠 CharsLoop ;
忽 CharsLoop ;
怒 CharsLoop ;
怛 CharsLoop ;
急 CharsLoop ;
怯 CharsLoop ;
恐 CharsLoop ;
恤 CharsLoop ;
息 CharsLoop ;
恺 CharsLoop ;
悔 CharsLoop ;
悦 CharsLoop ;
悼 CharsLoop ;
惘 CharsLoop ;
惠 CharsLoop ;
惯 CharsLoop ;
意 CharsLoop ;
愧 CharsLoop ;
慎 CharsLoop ;
慨 CharsLoop ;
憨 CharsLoop ;
懂 CharsLoop ;
戈 CharsLoop ;
戏 CharsLoop ;
或 CharsLoop ;
截 CharsLoop ;
房 CharsLoop ;
扉 CharsLoop ;
扑 CharsLoop ;
扞 CharsLoop ;
扩 CharsLoop ;
扮 CharsLoop ;
扶 CharsLoop ;
技 CharsLoop ;
抓 CharsLoop ;
折 CharsLoop ;
护 CharsLoop ;
抱 CharsLoop ;
抽 CharsLoop ;
拉 CharsLoop ;
拓 CharsLoop ;
招 CharsLoop ;
拥 CharsLoop ;
括 CharsLoop ;
拼 CharsLoop ;
挂 CharsLoop ;
挟 CharsLoop ;
挨 CharsLoop ;
挽 CharsLoop ;
损 CharsLoop ;
捧 CharsLoop ;
掉 CharsLoop ;
掖 CharsLoop ;
接 CharsLoop ;
措 CharsLoop ;
提 CharsLoop ;
揭 CharsLoop ;
搜 CharsLoop ;
携 CharsLoop ;
摊 CharsLoop ;
摩 CharsLoop ;
撒 CharsLoop ;
播 CharsLoop ;
擅 CharsLoop ;
擦 CharsLoop ;
攻 CharsLoop ;
效 CharsLoop ;
敕 CharsLoop ;
散 CharsLoop ;
敲 CharsLoop ;
斋 CharsLoop ;
斗 CharsLoop ;
斡 CharsLoop ;
斯 CharsLoop ;
旁 CharsLoop ;
旗 CharsLoop ;
旦 CharsLoop ;
旬 CharsLoop ;
旷 CharsLoop ;
昊 CharsLoop ;
昔 CharsLoop ;
春 CharsLoop ;
昵 CharsLoop ;
晒 CharsLoop ;
晚 CharsLoop ;
晰 CharsLoop ;
暂 CharsLoop ;
暗 CharsLoop ;
曙 CharsLoop ;
更 CharsLoop ;
替 CharsLoop ;
有 CharsLoop ;
望 CharsLoop ;
木 CharsLoop ;
札 CharsLoop ;
朵 CharsLoop ;
权 CharsLoop ;
材 CharsLoop ;
杠 CharsLoop ;
杭 CharsLoop ;
板 CharsLoop ;
析 CharsLoop ;
枝 CharsLoop ;
架 CharsLoop ;
染 CharsLoop ;
查 CharsLoop ;
柴 CharsLoop ;
栈 CharsLoop ;
栓 CharsLoop ;
样 CharsLoop ;
桂 CharsLoop ;
桌 CharsLoop ;
桥 CharsLoop ;
梁 CharsLoop ;
梨 CharsLoop ;
梶 CharsLoop ;
棒 CharsLoop ;
棣 CharsLoop ;
植 CharsLoop ;
椹 CharsLoop ;
楠 CharsLoop ;
概 CharsLoop ;
槃 CharsLoop ;
模 CharsLoop ;
橙 CharsLoop ;
次 CharsLoop ;
欺 CharsLoop ;
步 CharsLoop ;
残 CharsLoop ;
比 CharsLoop ;
氟 CharsLoop ;
氷 CharsLoop ;
江 CharsLoop ;
汾 CharsLoop ;
沪 CharsLoop ;
泄 CharsLoop ;
泣 CharsLoop ;
洁 CharsLoop ;
洲 CharsLoop ;
测 CharsLoop ;
浩 CharsLoop ;
涎 CharsLoop ;
涯 CharsLoop ;
淘 CharsLoop ;
添 CharsLoop ;
渭 CharsLoop ;
溃 CharsLoop ;
滔 CharsLoop ;
滴 CharsLoop ;
漩 CharsLoop ;
澳 CharsLoop ;
灯 CharsLoop ;
炒 CharsLoop ;
烂 CharsLoop ;
热 CharsLoop ;
煌 CharsLoop ;
熊 CharsLoop ;
爆 CharsLoop ;
片 CharsLoop ;
牢 CharsLoop ;
犄 CharsLoop ;
狗 CharsLoop ;
狼 CharsLoop ;
献 CharsLoop ;
王 CharsLoop ;
珀 CharsLoop ;
琪 CharsLoop ;
瑞 CharsLoop ;
瓷 CharsLoop ;
田 CharsLoop ;
畅 CharsLoop ;
畴 CharsLoop ;
疼 CharsLoop ;
痰 CharsLoop ;
発 CharsLoop ;
皈 CharsLoop ;
监 CharsLoop ;
目 CharsLoop ;
眉 CharsLoop ;
督 CharsLoop ;
瞻 CharsLoop ;
矮 CharsLoop ;
破 CharsLoop ;
确 CharsLoop ;
碰 CharsLoop ;
礁 CharsLoop ;
祗 CharsLoop ;
祸 CharsLoop ;
秃 CharsLoop ;
秤 CharsLoop ;
稍 CharsLoop ;
稽 CharsLoop ;
穿 CharsLoop ;
立 CharsLoop ;
竭 CharsLoop ;
笔 CharsLoop ;
答 CharsLoop ;
箱 CharsLoop ;
类 CharsLoop ;
粹 CharsLoop ;
素 CharsLoop ;
絲 CharsLoop ;
约 CharsLoop ;
纷 CharsLoop ;
组 CharsLoop ;
绑 CharsLoop ;
绞 CharsLoop ;
维 CharsLoop ;
缆 CharsLoop ;
缝 CharsLoop ;
网 CharsLoop ;
羌 CharsLoop ;
翅 CharsLoop ;
考 CharsLoop ;
耦 CharsLoop ;
聚 CharsLoop ;
肝 CharsLoop ;
肯 CharsLoop ;
胃 CharsLoop ;
胡 CharsLoop ;
能 CharsLoop ;
脚 CharsLoop ;
腓 CharsLoop ;
膀 CharsLoop ;
臣 CharsLoop ;
舌 CharsLoop ;
舰 CharsLoop ;
色 CharsLoop ;
芥 CharsLoop ;
苍 CharsLoop ;
苯 CharsLoop ;
茆 CharsLoop ;
茹 CharsLoop ;
荣 CharsLoop ;
莫 CharsLoop ;
菜 CharsLoop ;
萤 CharsLoop ;
葡 CharsLoop ;
蒜 CharsLoop ;
蔓 CharsLoop ;
薄 CharsLoop ;
藿 CharsLoop ;
虢 CharsLoop ;
蛋 CharsLoop ;
蜚 CharsLoop ;
螺 CharsLoop ;
街 CharsLoop ;
衷 CharsLoop ;
袭 CharsLoop ;
裸 CharsLoop ;
要 CharsLoop ;
览 CharsLoop ;
詹 CharsLoop ;
讨 CharsLoop ;
论 CharsLoop ;
诊 CharsLoop ;
诞 CharsLoop ;
请 CharsLoop ;
谈 CharsLoop ;
谜 CharsLoop ;
谴 CharsLoop ;
豹 CharsLoop ;
责 CharsLoop ;
贫 CharsLoop ;
贸 CharsLoop ;
资 CharsLoop ;
赞 CharsLoop ;
赶 CharsLoop ;
趾 CharsLoop ;
跳 CharsLoop ;
躁 CharsLoop ;
轩 CharsLoop ;
轻 CharsLoop ;
辐 CharsLoop ;
辣 CharsLoop ;
迁 CharsLoop ;
返 CharsLoop ;
迪 CharsLoop ;
送 CharsLoop ;
逐 CharsLoop ;
逢 CharsLoop ;
遇 CharsLoop ;
遥 CharsLoop ;
邦 CharsLoop ;
郁 CharsLoop ;
鄯 CharsLoop ;
酮 CharsLoop ;
醇 CharsLoop ;
里 CharsLoop ;
鍪 CharsLoop ;
钟 CharsLoop ;
钸 CharsLoop ;
铭 CharsLoop ;
锁 CharsLoop ;
锡 CharsLoop ;
镐 CharsLoop ;
闭 CharsLoop ;
阀 CharsLoop ;
阮 CharsLoop ;
阿 CharsLoop ;
降 CharsLoop ;
陵 CharsLoop ;
障 CharsLoop ;
雕 CharsLoop ;
霆 CharsLoop ;
静 CharsLoop ;
鞋 CharsLoop ;
願 CharsLoop ;
顿 CharsLoop ;
颗 CharsLoop ;
飘 CharsLoop ;
饰 CharsLoop ;
馅 CharsLoop ;
驰 CharsLoop ;
骂 CharsLoop ;
骚 CharsLoop ;
鬼 CharsLoop ;
鲜 CharsLoop ;
鸭 CharsLoop ;
鹰 CharsLoop ;
黑 CharsLoop ;
鼻 CharsLoop ;
